src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-ngaedarasjTS_gt-norm.yaml
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Loc+Abs: ӈэдаравэхэна
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Loc+PxDu1: ӈэдаравэхэнаниʼ
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Loc+PxDu2: ӈэдаравэхэнандиʼ
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Loc+PxDu3: ӈэдаравэхэнандиʼ
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Loc+PxPl1: ӈэдаравэхэнанаˮ
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Loc+PxPl2: ӈэдаравэхэнандаˮ
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Loc+PxPl3: ӈэдаравэхэнандоʼ
#     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Loc+PxSg1.2: ӈэдаравэхэнани
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: [ӈэдаравэхэнан, ӈэдаравэхэнани]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: ӈэдаравэхэнанд
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Loc+PxSg3: ӈэдаравэхэнанда
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Nom+Abs: ӈэдаравы
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Nom+PxDu1: ӈэдаравэмиʼ
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Nom+PxDu2: ӈэдаравэриʼ
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Nom+PxDu3: ӈэдаравэдиʼ
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: ӈэдаравэваˮ
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: ӈэдаравэраˮ
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Nom+PxPl3: ӈэдаравэдоʼ
#     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Nom+PxSg1.2: ӈэдаравэми
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: [ӈэдаравэв, ӈэдаравэми]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: ӈэдаравэр
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: ӈэдаравэда
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Pros+Abs: ӈэдаравэвна
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Pros+PxDu1: ӈэдаравэвнаниʼ
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Pros+PxDu2: ӈэдаравэвнандиʼ
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Pros+PxDu3: ӈэдаравэвнандиʼ
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Pros+PxPl1: ӈэдаравэвнанаˮ
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Pros+PxPl2: ӈэдаравэвнандаˮ
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Pros+PxPl3: ӈэдаравэвнандоʼ
#     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Pros+PxSg1.2: ӈэдаравэвнани
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Pros+PxSg1: [ӈэдаравэвнан, ӈэдаравэвнани]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Pros+PxSg2: ӈэдаравэвнанд
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Pros+PxSg3: ӈэдаравэвнанда
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Tra: ӈэдаравэӈэ
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Prec+Hort+ScDu1+OcDu3: [ӈэдарахарцюхуюниʼ, ӈэдарахарцяхаюниʼ]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Prec+Hort+ScDu1+OcPl3: [ӈэдарахарцюниʼ, ӈэдарахарцяниʼ]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Prec+Hort+ScDu1+OcSg3: [ӈэдарахарцюмиʼ, ӈэдарахарцямиʼ]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Prec+Hort+ScDu1: [ӈэдарахарцюниʼ, ӈэдарахарцяниʼ]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Prec+Hort+ScPl1+OcDu3: [ӈэдарахарцюхуюнаˮ, ӈэдарахарцяхаюнаˮ]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Prec+Hort+ScPl1+OcPl3: [ӈэдарахарцюнаˮ, ӈэдарахарцянаˮ]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Prec+Hort+ScPl1+OcSg3: [ӈэдарахарцюваˮ, ӈэдарахарцяваˮ]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Prec+Hort+ScPl1: [ӈэдарахарцюваˮ, ӈэдарахарцяваˮ]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Prec+Hort+ScSg1+OcDu3: [ӈэдарахарцюхуюн, ӈэдарахарцяхаюн]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Prec+Hort+ScSg1+OcPl3: [ӈэдарахарцюн, ӈэдарахарцян]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Prec+Hort+ScSg1+OcSg3: [ӈэдарахарцюв, ӈэдарахарцяв]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Prec+Hort+ScSg1: [ӈэдарахарцюдмʼ, ӈэдарахарцядмʼ]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Prec+Imprt+ScDu2+OcDu3: [ӈэдарахарˮӈахаюдиʼ, ӈэдарахарӈахаюдиʼ]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Prec+Imprt+ScDu2+OcPl3: ӈэдарахаръядиʼ
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Prec+Imprt+ScDu2+OcSg3: [ӈэдарахарˮӈариʼ, ӈэдарахарӈариʼ]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Prec+Imprt+ScDu2: [ӈэдарахарˮӈадиʼ, ӈэдарахарӈадиʼ]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Prec+Imprt+ScPl2+OcDu3: [ӈэдарахарˮӈахаюдаˮ, ӈэдарахарӈахаюдаˮ]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Prec+Imprt+ScPl2+OcPl3: ӈэдарахаръядаˮ
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Prec+Imprt+ScPl2+OcSg3: [ӈэдарахарˮӈараˮ, ӈэдарахарӈараˮ]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Prec+Imprt+ScPl2: [ӈэдарахарˮӈадаˮ, ӈэдарахарӈадаˮ]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Prec+Imprt+ScSg2+OcDu3: ӈэдарахаркаюнˮ
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Prec+Imprt+ScSg2+OcPl3: ӈэдарахаранˮ
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Prec+Imprt+ScSg2+OcSg3: ӈэдарахарт
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Prec+Imprt+ScSg2: ӈэдарахарˮ
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Prec+Opt+ScDu3+OcDu3: [ӈэдарахарˮӈахаюдамдиʼ, ӈэдарахарӈахаюдамдиʼ]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Prec+Opt+ScDu3+OcPl3: ӈэдарахаръядамдиʼ
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Prec+Opt+ScDu3+OcSg3: [ӈэдарахарˮӈамдиʼ, ӈэдарахарӈамдиʼ]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Prec+Opt+ScDu3: [ӈэдарахарˮӈаяхаʼ, ӈэдарахарӈаяхаʼ]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Prec+Opt+ScPl3+OcDu3: [ӈэдарахарˮӈахаюдамдоʼ, ӈэдарахарӈахаюдамдоʼ]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Prec+Opt+ScPl3+OcPl3: ӈэдарахаръядамдоʼ
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Prec+Opt+ScPl3+OcSg3: [ӈэдарахарˮӈамдоʼ, ӈэдарахарӈамдоʼ]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Prec+Opt+ScPl3: [ӈэдарахарˮӈаяˮ, ӈэдарахарӈаяˮ]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Prec+Opt+ScSg3+OcDu3: [ӈэдарахарˮӈахаюдамда, ӈэдарахарӈахаюдамда]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Prec+Opt+ScSg3+OcPl3: ӈэдарахаръядамда
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Prec+Opt+ScSg3+OcSg3: [ӈэдарахарˮӈамда, ӈэдарахарӈамда]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Prec+Opt+ScSg3: [ӈэдарахарˮӈая, ӈэдарахарӈая]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Subord/бˮ1+Abs: ӈэдарабˮ
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Subord/бˮ1+PxDu1: ӈэдарабˮниʼ
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Subord/бˮ1+PxDu2: ӈэдарабтиʼ
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Subord/бˮ1+PxDu3: ӈэдарабтиʼ
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Subord/бˮ1+PxPl1: ӈэдарабˮнаˮ
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Subord/бˮ1+PxPl2: ӈэдарабтаˮ
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Subord/бˮ1+PxPl3: ӈэдарабтоʼ
#     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Subord/бˮ1+PxSg1.2: ӈэдарабˮни
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Subord/бˮ1+PxSg1: [ӈэдарабаˮн, ӈэдарабˮни]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Subord/бˮ1+PxSg2: ӈэдарабат
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Subord/бˮ1+PxSg3: ӈэдарабта
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Subord/бˮна2+PxDu1: ӈэдарабˮнаниʼ
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Subord/бˮна2+PxDu2: ӈэдарабˮнандиʼ
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Subord/бˮна2+PxDu3: ӈэдарабˮнандиʼ
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Subord/бˮна2+PxPl1: ӈэдарабˮнанаˮ
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Subord/бˮна2+PxPl2: ӈэдарабˮнандаˮ
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Subord/бˮна2+PxPl3: ӈэдарабˮнандоʼ
#     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Subord/бˮна2+PxSg1.2: ӈэдарабˮнани
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Subord/бˮна2+PxSg1: [ӈэдарабˮнан, ӈэдарабˮнани, ӈэдараӈгобˮнани, ӈэдараӈгодабˮнани, ӈэдараӈгобаˮнани]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Subord/бˮна2+PxSg2: ӈэдарабˮнанд
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Subord/бˮна2+PxSg3: ӈэдарабˮнанда
